Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may not require a primary care provider
to order a covered care management service, as  listed in the schedule developed under sub-
section (2) of this section, as a condition of reimbursing the costs of the service when:
(a) The service is provided to a medical assistance recipient  by a registered nurse li-
censed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410;
(b) The service is within the nurse’s authorized scope of practice; and
(c) The patient does not have a primary care provider.
(2) The authority shall, in consultation with stakeholders:
(a) Develop and maintain a schedule of  covered care management services for which a
registered nurse may seek reimbursement under this section; and
(b) Establish billing and documentation protocols to protect program integrity, including
the use of national provider identifiers by registered nurses seeking reimbursement under
this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Health Authority may take any action before the operative date
specified in section 3 of  this 2025 Act that is necessary to enable the authority to exercise,
on and after the  operative date specified in section 3 of this 2025 Act, all the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2789 (HB 2789-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2789 (HB 2789-INTRO) Page 2